Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1001

Dissolution and winding up.

A limited cooperative association is dissolved only as provided in this section and RCW 23.100.1002 through 23.100.1013 and upon dissolution winds up in accordance with this section and RCW 23.100.1002 through 23.100.1013.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1001.]